Illinois, session 104th, HB1096.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-2-2.5 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-2.5 new)7    Sec. 3-2-2.5. Department programs; equal standing for 8committed persons. On and after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 10of Corrections shall make available to each person within the 11Department's custody all rehabilitative and educational 12programs and services available to committed persons within 13that committed person's facility if the committed person is 14otherwise qualified for those programs and services, 15notwithstanding the committed person's projected release date. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.